Florida, session 2026, SB1352.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 34 35 Section 1.âSubsection (7) is added to section 320.06, 36 Florida Statutes, to read: 37 320.06âRegistration certificates, license plates, and 38 validation stickers generally.â 39 (7)âThe department shall establish and maintain a secure 40 online license and registration portal accessible to the 41 department, tax collectors, and authorized law enforcement 42 agencies for the purpose of verifying, recording, and processing 43 the seizure or confiscation of license plates under this 44 chapter. The portal must provide immediate status updates when a 45 plate has been seized, destroyed, or returned and must be 46 checked before reissuance of a registration or plate. The 47 department may adopt rules to implement this subsection. 48 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 320.084, Florida 49 Statutes, is amended to read: 50 320.084âFree motor vehicle license plate to certain 51 disabled veterans.â 52 (3)âThe department shall, as it deems necessary, require 53 each person to whom a motor vehicle license plate has been 54 issued pursuant to subsection (1) to apply to the department for 55 reissuance of his or her registration license plate. Upon 56 receipt of the application and proof of the applicantâs 57 continued eligibility, the department shall issue a new 58 permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license plate which 59 shall be of the colors red, white, and blue similar to the 60 colors of the United States flag. A disabled veteran who has 61 been issued a permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license 62 plate may retain the unique alphanumeric designation assigned to 63 the plate upon reissuance, renewal, or transfer of the plate to 64 another vehicle owned by the veteran. The operation of a motor 65 vehicle displaying a disabled veteran license plate from a 66 previous issue period or a noncurrent validation sticker after 67 the date specified by the department shall subject the owner if 68 he or she is present, otherwise the operator, to the penalty 69 provided in s. 318.18(2). Such permanent license plate shall be 70 removed upon sale of the vehicle, but may be transferred to 71 another vehicle owned by such veteran in the manner prescribed 72 by law. Upon request of any such veteran, the department is 73 authorized to issue a designation plate containing only the 74 letters âDV,â to be displayed on the front of the vehicle. 75 Section 3.âSection 320.0843, Florida Statutes, is amended 76 to read: 77 320.0843âLicense plates for persons with disabilities 78 eligible for permanent disabled parking permits.â 79 (1)âAny owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who resides in 80 this state and qualifies for a disabled parking permit under s. 81 320.0848(2), upon application to the department, or the tax 82 collector as an authorized agent of the department, and payment 83 of the license tax for a motor vehicle registered under s. 84 320.08(2), (3)(a), (b), (c), or (e), (4)(a) or (b), (6)(a), or 85 (9)(c) or (d), shall be issued a license plate as provided by s. 86 320.06 which, in lieu of or in addition to the serial number 87 prescribed by s. 320.06, shall, at the option of the applicant, 88 be stamped with the international wheelchair user symbol or the 89 letters âDVâ indicating a disabled veteran after the serial 90 number of the license plate. The license plate entitles the 91 person to all privileges afforded by a parking permit issued 92 under s. 320.0848. When more than one registrant is listed on 93 the registration issued under this section, the eligible 94 applicant shall be noted on the registration certificate. 95 (2)âAll applications for such license plates may must be 96 made to the department or the tax collector, and such license 97 plates may be issued immediately on demand by the tax collector, 98 subject to rules of the department. 99 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 100 320.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 101 320.26âCounterfeiting license plates, validation stickers, 102 mobile home stickers, cab cards, trip permits, or special 103 temporary operational permits prohibited; obscuring or altering 104 license plates prohibited; penalty.â 105 (1)(a)âA no person may not: 106 1.âshall Counterfeit registration license plates, 107 validation stickers, or mobile home stickers, or have in his or 108 her possession any such plates or stickers. 109 2.â; nor shall any person Manufacture, sell, or dispose of 110 registration license plates, validation stickers, or mobile home 111 stickers in this the state without first having obtained the 112 permission and authority of the department in writing. 113 3.âManufacture, sell, offer for sale, or affix to any 114 registration license plate any cover, film, or overlay, whether 115 transparent, translucent, tinted, or opaque, which obscures or 116 alters the legibility, color, or design of the registration 117 license plate. 118 Section 5.âSubsection (10) is added to section 322.21, 119 Florida Statutes, to read: 120 322.21âLicense fees; procedure for handling and collecting 121 fees.â 122 (10)(a)âAny renewal or replacement driver license or 123 identification card ordered through the departmentâs online 124 license and registration portal shall be fulfilled by the tax 125 collector of the county in which the applicant resides. The 126 department shall ensure that all online orders are transmitted 127 to the appropriate tax collector for fulfillment. The tax 128 collector may mail the driver license or identification card to 129 the applicant or, at the option of the applicant, may allow the 130 applicant to pick up the driver license or identification card 131 at the tax collectorâs office. 132 (b)âFor purposes of s. 322.135(1)(c), fulfillment under 133 paragraph (a) constitutes services provided by the tax 134 collector. The department shall remit the service fee authorized 135 by s. 322.135(1)(c) to the appropriate tax collector for each 136 transaction fulfilled under paragraph (a). 137 Section 6.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 138 320.0848, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 139 320.0848âPersons who have disabilities; issuance of 140 disabled parking permits; temporary permits; permits for certain 141 providers of transportation services to persons who have 142 disabilities.â 143 (2)âDISABLED PARKING PERMIT; PERSONS WITH LONG-TERM 144 MOBILITY PROBLEMS.â 145 (e)âA person who qualifies for a disabled parking permit 146 under this section may be issued an international wheelchair 147 user symbol or âDVâ license plate under s. 320.0843 in lieu of 148 the disabled parking permit; or, if the person qualifies for a 149 disabled veteran license plate under s. 320.084, such a license 150 plate may be issued to him or her in lieu of a disabled parking 151 permit. 152 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.